Tennessee, session 114, SB2212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-210(c), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(c) A claim for payment of an annuity pursuant to this section must be filed with
the department of finance and administration no later than three (3) years after the later
of the following:
(1) The date of death of the decedent; or
(2) The date of a final order or other determination designating the
decedent's death as being in the line of duty that is issued by a court,
administrative law judge, or other state or local government official, entity, or
body with the authority to issue such order or determination.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-210(e), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(e)
(1) A denial of a claim made under this section by the estate of a law
enforcement officer is subject to review by the Tennessee peace officer
standards and training commission within one (1) year of the date of the denial.
The commission has the authority to review the claim and issue a final order or
other determination which is binding upon this state. The commission shall
SB2212
010599
- 1 -

cause copies of the final order or determination to be delivered to the claimant's
estate and the department of finance and administration.
(2) A denial of a claim made under this section by the estate of a
firefighter or volunteer rescue squad worker is subject to review by the
commission on firefighting personnel standards and education within one (1) year
of the date of the denial. The commission has the authority to review the claim
and issue a final order or other determination which is binding upon this state.
The commission shall cause copies of the final order or determination to be
delivered to the claimant's estate and the department of finance and
administration. The commissioner shall not participate in the commission's
review of a denied claim; except, that the commissioner may offer testimony
regarding the commissioner's reasons for denying the claim, if requested by the
commission.
(3) A denial of a claim made under this section by the estate of an
emergency medical technician is subject to review by the Tennessee emergency
medical services board within one (1) year of the date of the denial. The board
has the authority to review the claim and issue a final order or other
determination which is binding upon this state. The board shall cause copies of
the final order or determination to be delivered to the claimant's estate and the
department of finance and administration.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and unless prohibited by the United States Constitution or Tennessee Constitution, is retroactive
to March 1, 2020.
- 2 - 010599